Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB184.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 1 OF KRS CHAPTER 304 IS CREATED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cost-sharing requirement" means a:
1. Prohibition outright on the imposition of any deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or other
out-of-pocket expense, other than premiums, under a health insurance policy, certificate, plan,
or contract; or
2. Limitation on the amount of any deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or other out-of-pocket
expense, other than premiums, that is imposed under a health insurance policy, certificate,
plan, or contract;
(b) "Enrollee":
1. Means an individual who is enrolled in health insurance, whether on an individual or a group
basis; and
2. Includes any covered dependent of an individual referenced in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph; and
(c) "Health savings account-qualified insurance plan" means a high deductible health plan that covers
individuals who may be entitled to receive certain tax benefits under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended,
with respect to contributions made to a health savings account.
(2) If, under federal law, the application of any cost-sharing requirement in this chapter or any other state law
would cause an enrollee's health savings account-qualified insurance plan to no longer qualify as a high
deductible health plan under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, then the cost-sharing requirement shall only
apply to the enrollee's plan once the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, has been
satisfied.
(3) In the event of a conflict between this section and any other state law, this section shall control.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 18A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the cost-sharing requirements in this chapter shall
be subject to Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act apply to policies, certificates, plans, and contracts issued or
renewed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 4. The purpose of Section 1 of this Act is to protect the efficacy of Health Savings Account-
qualified insurance plans in this state by establishing a safe harbor from state benefit mandates that would result in a
health insurance policy, certificate, plan, or contract losing its health savings account-qualified status under federal
law.
Section 5. Section 1 of this Act may be cited as the Health Savings Account State-Federal Regulatory
Coordination Model Act.
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version